Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3905
Jurisdiction.

(a) A petition under the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act may be filed only in a court that has jurisdiction to make a child custody determination with respect to the child at issue under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

(b) A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction under section 43-1241 if the court finds a credible risk of abduction.

Laws 2007, LB341, § 5.

Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, see section 43-1226.